New Jersey, session 221, A4156.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  A clinic that is part of the extramural network of dental clinics established by the Rutgers School of Dental Medicine, or by any other dental school of a public institution of higher education, shall give priority to any 100 percent disabled veteran seeking oral health services, when scheduling appointments at the dental clinic.  As used in this section, 100 percent disabled veteran means any citizen and resident of this State honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who is adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, as being permanently 100 percent disabled. In giving priority to a 100 percent disabled veteran, a dental clinic shall ensure that an oral health treatment appointment for the veteran is scheduled in a timely manner and that the time between the scheduling of the appointment and the occurrence of the appointment does not exceed 30 days. 2.  The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.